Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.830

Board of adjustment—Appeals—Time limit.

Appeals may be taken to the board of adjustment by any person aggrieved, or by any officer, department, board or bureau of the county affected by any decision of an administrative official. Such appeals shall be filed in writing in duplicate with the board of adjustment within twenty days of the date of the action being appealed.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.830. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 83.]